New York, session 2025-2026, A3301.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Section 922 of the education law, as amended by chapter 68 2 of the laws of 2016, is amended to read as follows: 3 § 922. Opioid overdose prevention. 1. School districts, public 4 libraries, boards of cooperative educational services, county vocational 5 education and extension boards, charter schools, and non-public elemen- 6 tary and secondary schools in this state [may] shall provide and main- 7 tain on-site in each instructional school facility or library, opioid 8 antagonists, as defined in section three thousand three hundred nine of 9 the public health law, in quantities and types deemed by the commission- 10 er, in consultation with the commissioner of health, to be adequate to 11 ensure ready and appropriate access for use during emergencies to any 12 student, individual on library premises or staff suspected of having 13 opioid overdose whether or not there is a previous history of opioid 14 abuse. 15 2. School districts, public libraries, boards of cooperative educa- 16 tional services, county vocational education and extension boards, char- 17 ter schools, and non-public elementary and secondary schools in this 18 state [may elect to] shall participate as an opioid antagonist recipient 19 and any person employed by any such entity [that has elected to partic- 20 ipate] may administer an opioid antagonist in the event of an emergency, 21 provided that such person shall have been trained by a program approved 22 under section three thousand three hundred nine of the public health EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD02013-01-5 A. 3301 2 1 law. Any school district, public library, board of cooperative educa- 2 tional services, county vocational education and extension board, char- 3 ter school, and non-public elementary and secondary school that has 4 employees trained in accordance with this section shall comply with the 5 requirements of section three thousand three hundred nine of the public 6 health law including, but not limited to, appropriate clinical over- 7 sight, record keeping and reporting. [No person shall be required to 8 participate in the program and any participation by an individual shall 9 be voluntary.] 10 § 2. This act shall take effect on the sixtieth day after it shall 11 have become a law.